Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1230.
do enact as follows:AB1230,13Section 1. 218.50 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1230,2,44218.50 (6) “Qualified applicant” means a motor vehicle dealer, wholesaler, or 1salvage dealer licensed under this chapter, a motor vehicle dealer, wholesaler, or 2salvage dealer licensed in another jurisdiction, a school district, or an employee of a 3motor vehicle dealer, wholesaler or, salvage dealer, or school district under this 4subsection.AB1230,2,55